test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-40talo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - talo: # Noun (40) talo 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    talo+N+Sg+Nom: talo
    talo+N+Sg+Gen: talo
    talo+N+Sg+Par: tallo
    talo+N+Sg+Ill: tallo
    talo+N+Sg+Ine: talon
    talo+N+Sg+Ela: talost
    talo+N+Sg+All: talolõ
    talo+N+Sg+Ade: talol
    talo+N+Sg+Abl: talolt
    talo+N+Sg+Tra: talos
    talo+N+Sg+Ter: taloniq
    talo+N+Sg+Abe: taloldaq
    talo+N+Sg+Com: talogaq
    talo+N+Pl+Nom: taloq
    talo+N+Pl+Gen: tallõ
    talo+N+Pl+Par: tallõ
    talo+N+Pl+Ill: tallõhe
    talo+N+Pl+Ine: talõn
    talo+N+Pl+Ela: talõst
    talo+N+Pl+All: talõlõ
    talo+N+Pl+Ade: talõl
    talo+N+Pl+Abl: talõlt
    talo+N+Pl+Tra: talõs
    talo+N+Pl+Ter: talõniq
    talo+N+Pl+Abe: talõldaq
    talo+N+Pl+Com: tallõgaq
